fi: Hiusten leikkaustyyppi: Suorat; Kääntyvä; Teksturointi; Harvennus; Muu
bg-BG: Тип ножици за коса: Права; Регулируема; Текстурираща; Изтъняваща; Други
pl: Rodzaj nożyczek do włosów: Prosta; Rotacja; Teksturujące; Przerzedzające; Inne
da: Hårsaksetype: Lige; Drejelig; Teksturering; Udtynding; Andet
tr: Saç kesme tipi: Düz; Tablalı; Dokulandırıcı; İnceltme; Diğer
th: กรรไกรตัดผม: ผมตรง; ล้อเลื่อน; กรรไกรตัดแต่งพื้นผิว; กรรไกรซอยผม; อื่นๆ
nl: Type haarschaar: Steil; Draaibaar; Textureren; Verdunnen; Andere
ja: ヘアせん断タイプ: ストレート; スイベル; テクスチャライジング; セニング; その他
zh-TW: 理髮剪類型: 直; 萬向型; 質感化; 打薄; 其他
fr: Type de ciseaux de coiffeur: Lisses; Pivot; Texturation; Désépaississement; Autre
lt-LT: Plaukų žirklių tipas: Tiesios; Reguliuojamomis angomis pirštams; Filiravimo; Ploninančios; Kita
sv: Typ av hårsax: Rakt; Snurra; Texturering; Gallring; Övrigt
it: Tipo di taglio dei capelli: Dritto; Girevole; Texturizzante; Diradamento; Altro
es: Tipo de tijeras para el cabello: Liso; Giratorio; Texturizadas; Reductoras; Otros
cs: Typ stříhání vlasů: Rovné; Otočná; Texturování; Ztenčování; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de tesoura de cabelo: Liso; Giratório; Texturização; Com queda; Outro
nb: Hårklippstype: Rett; Svingbar; Teksturering; Tynning; Annet
vi: Kiểu cắt tóc: Tóc thẳng; Lốp xoay; Kết cấu; Tỉa thưa; Khác
hu: Hajvágó olló típusa: Egyenes; Forgó; Textúrázó; Ritkító; Egyéb
el: Τύπος ψαλίδας: Ευθεία; Περιστροφή; Υφής; Αραίωσης; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta škara za kosu: Ravne; Zakretne; Za teksturiranje; Za prorjeđivanje; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ strihania vlasov: Rovný; Otočné swivel; Texturizačné; Efilačné; Iné
zh-CN: 理发剪类型: 直; 旋转式; 纹理剪; 打薄剪; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de tesoura de cabelo: Liso; Torniquete; Texturização capilar; Desbastar; Outro
ru: Тип ножниц для волос: Прямые; Завивка; Текстурирование; Прореживание; Другое
de: Haarscherentyp: Glatt; Wirbel; Texturieren; Verdünnen; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tipul foarfeci pentru păr: Drept; Cu inel rotativ; Texturizare; Subțiere; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta striženja las: Ravni; Vrtljive; Teksturiranje; Redčenje; Drugo
ko: 헤어 커팅 타입: 일자형; 스위블; 텍스처링; 가늘어짐; 기타
en: Hair shear type: Straight; Swivel; Texturizing; Thinning; Other